Florida, session 2026, SB7014.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âSubsection (8) of section 287.137, Florida 20 Statutes, is amended to read: 21 287.137âAntitrust violations; denial or revocation of the 22 right to transact business with public entities; denial of 23 economic benefits.â 24 (8)(a)âAll information received by the Attorney General 25 under paragraph (3)(d) pursuant to an investigation by the 26 Attorney General or a law enforcement agency is confidential and 27 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 28 Constitution until such time as the investigation is completed 29 or ceases to be active. This exemption shall be construed in 30 conformity with s. 119.071(2)(c). 31 (b)âDuring an active investigation, information made 32 confidential and exempt pursuant to paragraph (a) may be 33 disclosed by the Attorney General: 34 1.âIn the performance of his or her official duties and 35 responsibilities; or 36 2.âTo another governmental entity in performance of its 37 official duties and responsibilities. 38 (c)âOnce an investigation is completed or ceases to be 39 active, the following information received by the Attorney 40 General shall remain confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) 41 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 42 1.âAll information to which another public records 43 exemption applies. 44 2.âPersonal identifying information. 45 3.âA computer forensic report. 46 4.âInformation that would otherwise reveal weaknesses in a 47 businessâs data security. 48 5.âProprietary business information. 49 (d)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term âproprietary 50 business informationâ means information that: 51 1.âIs owned or controlled by the business; 52 2.âIs intended to be private and is treated by the business 53 as private because disclosure would harm the business or its 54 business operations; 55 3.âHas not been disclosed except as required by law or a 56 private agreement that provides that the information will not be 57 released to the public; 58 4.âIs not publicly available or otherwise readily 59 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the 60 same configuration as received by the Attorney General; and 61 5.âIncludes: 62 a.âTrade secrets as defined in s. 688.002. 63 b.âCompetitive interests, the disclosure of which would 64 impair the competitive advantage of the business that is the 65 subject of the information. 66 (e)âThis subsection is subject to the Open Government 67 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 68 repealed on October 2, 2031 2026, unless reviewed and saved from 69 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 70 Section 2.âSubsection (10) of section 501.2041, Florida 71 Statutes, is amended to read: 72 501.2041âUnlawful acts and practices by social media 73 platforms.â 74 (10)(a)âAll information received by the department pursuant 75 to an investigation by the department or a law enforcement 76 agency of a violation of this section is confidential and exempt 77 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution 78 until such time as the investigation is completed or ceases to 79 be active. This exemption shall be construed in conformity with 80 s. 119.071(2)(c). 81 (b)âDuring an active investigation, information made 82 confidential and exempt pursuant to paragraph (a) may be 83 disclosed by the department: 84 1.âIn the performance of its official duties and 85 responsibilities; or 86 2.âTo another governmental entity in performance of its 87 official duties and responsibilities. 88 (c)âOnce an investigation is completed or ceases to be 89 active, the following information received by the department 90 shall remain confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 91 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 92 1.âAll information to which another public records 93 exemption applies. 94 2.âPersonal identifying information. 95 3.âA computer forensic report. 96 4.âInformation that would otherwise reveal weaknesses in a 97 businessâs data security. 98 5.âProprietary business information. 99 (d)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term âproprietary 100 business informationâ means information that: 101 1.âIs owned or controlled by the business; 102 2.âIs intended to be private and is treated by the business 103 as private because disclosure would harm the business or its 104 business operations; 105 3.âHas not been disclosed except as required by law or a 106 private agreement that provides that the information will not be 107 released to the public; 108 4.âIs not publicly available or otherwise readily 109 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the 110 same configuration as received by the department; and 111 5.âIncludes: 112 a.âTrade secrets as defined in s. 688.002. 113 b.âCompetitive interests, the disclosure of which would 114 impair the competitive advantage of the business that is the 115 subject of the information. 116 (e)âThis subsection is subject to the Open Government 117 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 118 repealed on October 2, 2031 2026, unless reviewed and saved from 119 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 120 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.